California statutes. Elections Code
 until the person is nominated for the office of President of the United States by the convention, receives less than 10 percent of the votes for nomination by the convention, releases the delegate from his or her obligation, or until two convention nominating ballots have been taken. Thereafter, each delegate shall be free to vote as he or she chooses, and no rule may be adopted by a delegation requiring the delegation to vote as a body or causing the vote of any delegate to go uncounted or unreported.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Republican Presidential Primary Ballot [6480. - 6480.]

6480.

The format of the presidential portion of the Republican primary ballot shall be governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, with the following exceptions:

(a) Instructions to voters shall exclude any reference to groups of candidates preferring a person whose name appears on the ballot or references to any group of candidates not expressing a preference for a particular candidate.

(b) In place of the heading:
 “for delegates to national convention. Vote for One Group Only.” shall appear the heading: “presidential preference. Vote for One.”

(c) Candidates for President shall be listed on the ballot in the same order provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13 for statewide candidates.

(d) Only the names of selected and unselected presidential candidates shall appear on the ballot in the spaces provided. No reference shall be made to their being preferred by candidates for delegates to the national convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. American Independent Party Presidential Primary [6500. - 6647.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6500. - 6502.]

6500.

This chapter shall be applicable to the presidential primary ballot of the American Independent Party only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

The presidential primary ballot shall be divided into a presidential preference portion and a delegate selection portion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

No filing fee is required from any person to be voted for at any presidential primary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Qualification of Candidates for Presidential Preference Portion of Primary Ballot [6520. - 6524.]

6520.

(a) The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the American Independent Party presidential preference ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized in the news media throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the nomination of the American Independent Party for President of the United States.

(b) On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement the Secretary
 of State may add candidates to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 11.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6521.

When the Secretary of State decides to place the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Section 6520, he or she shall notify the candidate that his or her name will appear on the ballot of this state in the presidential primary.

The Secretary of State shall also notify the candidate that he or she may withdraw his or her name from the ballot by filing with the Secretary of State an affidavit pursuant to Section 6522, no later than the 68th day before that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6522.

If a selected candidate or an unselected candidate files with the Secretary of State, no later than the 68th day before the presidential primary, an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is not now a candidate for the office of President of the United States at the forthcoming presidential primary election, his or her name shall be omitted from the list of names certified by the Secretary of State to the county elections officials for the ballot and his or her name shall not appear on the presidential preference portion of the primary
 ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6523.

Any unselected candidate desiring to have his or her name placed on the presidential preference primary ballot without filing a group of candidates for delegates, shall have nomination papers circulated in his or her behalf. In order to qualify his or her name for placement on the presidential preference primary ballot, the candidate’s nomination papers shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the American Independent Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as members of the American Independent Party as
 reflected in the report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day preceding the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6524.

The name of any presidential candidate, to whom are pledged a group of candidates who have qualified by petition for the delegate selection portion of the presidential primary ballot, shall, in addition, be automatically placed on the presidential preference portion of the ballot, without the filing of a separate petition for the presidential preference portion of the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determination of Number of Delegates to National Convention [6540. - 6543.]

6540.

The Chairperson of the State Central Committee of the American Independent Party shall notify the Secretary of State on or before the 120th day preceding the presidential primary as to the number of delegates to represent the state in the next national convention of his or her party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6541.

The notification of the number of delegates shall be in substantially the following form:

STATEMENT OF NUMBER OF DELEGATES TO AMERICAN INDEPENDENT PARTY NATIONAL CONVENTION

To the Secretary of State
Sacramento, California

You are hereby notified that the number of delegates to represent the State of California in the next national convention of the American Independent Party is ____.

 Dated this ____ day of ____, 20__.Chairperson of the State Central Committee of 
the American Independent Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 5.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6542.

If the chairperson of the state central committee fails to file a notice as to the number of delegates, the Secretary of State shall ascertain the number from the call for the national convention issued by the national committee of the party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6543.

The Secretary of State shall, on or before the 110th day preceding the presidential primary, certify to the county elections official of each county the number of delegates to be elected by the American Independent Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Qualification of Groups of Candidates for Delegate Selection Portion of Primary Ballot [6560. - 6568.]

6560.

Any three or more voters of the state who are registered as intending to affiliate with the American Independent Party may join as a committee in proposing the nomination of a group of candidates for delegates. The committee may elect its officers, select the candidates for delegates, select the chairman of the committee, secure the endorsement of the person, if any, preferred by the committee as candidate for presidential nominee, appoint alternates, assemble and file all necessary papers, and take all other action which may be necessary for the organization and
 election of the group. The committee in performing its functions may act through its officers or designated representatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6561.

The committee, on or before the 104th day before the presidential primary election, shall file with the Secretary of State a statement containing the name of the committee and the names of its officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6562.

The number of candidates for delegates grouped on a nomination paper shall be equal to the total number of delegates to be elected by the party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6563.

The candidates of each group shall be selected as follows:

(a) No less than two-thirds shall be selected to represent congressional districts, and each of these candidates shall be a resident of the district which he or she is selected to represent. Congressional district candidates shall be apportioned among congressional districts according to the ratio which the American Independent Party registration in the district bears to the total statewide registration of the party as determined by the
 Secretary of State on January 1 of the year in which the presidential primary is held, except that at least one candidate in the group shall be a resident of each congressional district.

(b) No more than one-third may be selected from the state at large without regard to congressional district of residence.

If the names are not so selected, the names shall not be certified to the county elections official by the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6564.

The number of alternates to be selected shall be no greater than one for each delegate, and the alternates shall be selected in the manner prescribed by Section 6563.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6565.

Each group of candidates for delegates that intends to pledge itself to the candidacy of a particular candidate for presidential nominee shall have the endorsement of the candidate for presidential nominee for whom the members of the group have filed a preference. The endorsement of the candidate for presidential nominee shall be filed with the Secretary of State before the circulation of any nomination papers of a group of candidates pledged to the support of his or her candidacy as presidential nominee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6566.

Any candidate whose nomination paper is filed in more than one group is disqualified from running as a member of any group.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6567.

Each candidate for delegate to the American Independent Party convention shall file with the Secretary of State, before the circulation of nomination papers of the group of candidates of which he or she is a member, an affidavit which shall be in substantially the following form:AFFIDAVIT OF CANDIDATE FOR DELEGATEState of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.I, ____, reside at No. ____ Street, in the City (or Town) of ____, in the County of ____ in the ____ Congressional District, State of California; my election precinct is ____ and I reside and am a voter therein, my post office address is ____, County of ____.

I desire to be a candidate, at the presidential primary to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, for delegate to the next national convention of the American Independent Party, and if elected as delegate I will qualify.

I personally prefer ____ as nominee of the American Independent Party for President of the United States, and hereby declare to the voters
 of my party in the State of California that if elected as delegate to their national party convention, I shall to the best of my judgment and ability, support ____ as nominee of the American Independent Party for president of the United States. (This statement of preference shall be omitted where the candidate for delegate is part of a group not expressing a preference for a particular candidate.)

I express no preference for a particular candidate. The chairman of my group is ____. (This statement shall be omitted where the candidate for delegate is part of a group expressing a preference for a particular candidate.)

I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.(Signed) _________________________________________________________

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 6.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6568.

Nomination papers for candidates for delegates shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the American Independent Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as members of the American Independent Party as reflected in the report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day preceding the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Preparation, Circulation, and Filing of Nomination Papers [6580. - 6599.]

6580.

This article applies to the nomination of a candidate for the presidential preference portion of the primary ballot, to the nomination of a slate of delegates pledged to the candidacy of a particular candidate, and to the nomination of a slate of delegates not expressing a preference for a particular candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6581.

Nomination papers properly prepared, circulated, signed, and verified shall be left for examination with the elections official of the county in which they are circulated at least 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 110.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6582.

Each signer of a nomination paper for the presidential primary ballot may sign only one paper. He or she shall declare his or her intention to support the presidential preference candidate or the group of candidates for delegates, add his or her place of residence, and give his or her street and number if any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6583.

Any nomination paper may be presented in sections. Each section shall contain the name of the presidential preference candidate, or the names of the candidates for delegates comprising the group, and, if applicable, that they have expressed a preference for a named person as candidate for presidential nominee of the party. Each section shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated. Only voters of the county registered as intending to affiliate with the American Independent Party are competent to sign.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6584.

Each section shall be prepared with the lines for signatures numbered, and shall have attached the affidavit of the circulator who obtained signatures to it, which shall meet all of the requirements of Section 104. No other affidavit is required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 7.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6585.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters, until it is otherwise proved by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6586.

The nomination paper for a candidate for the presidential preference portion of the ballot shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF PRESIDENTIAL PREFERENCE PRIMARY 
CANDIDATESection ____________Page ____________County of ______________. Nomination paper of a presidential preference candidate for the American Independent Party presidential primary ballot.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ____________, State of California, and am registered as intending to affiliate with the American Independent
 Party. I hereby nominate ____________ for the presidential preference portion of the American Independent Party’s presidential primary ballot, to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ____________ day of ____________, 20____. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate for the same office, or for any group of delegates, to the national convention of the party, and I further declare that I intend to support the candidate named herein.NumberSignaturePrinted nameResidence 1. 2. 3.etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ______, solemnly swear (or
 affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]3.That I secured signatures in the County of ____ to the nomination paper of a candidate in the presidential preference
 primary of the American Independent Party; that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ____, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____, 20_, and ____, 20_, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be. 
I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.
 (Signed)Circulator

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 8.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6587.

The nomination paper for a group of candidates for delegates, to the national convention shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF GROUP OF CANDIDATES FOR DELEGATES 
TO NATIONAL CONVENTIONSection ____________Page ____________County of ______________. Nomination paper of group of candidates for election as delegates by the American Independent Party pledged to the candidacy of ____________ as presidential nominee or expressing no preference, as the case may be.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of
 the County of ____________, State of California, and am registered as intending to affiliate with the American Independent Party. I hereby nominate the following:Residencecity NumberNamesor townCounty 1. 2. 3.etc.(to such number as may be required) etc., as candidates for delegates to the American Independent Party’s National Convention, to be voted for at the presidential primary to be held on the ____________ day of ____________, 20____. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidates for the same office, or of any candidate for the presidential preference portion of the primary ballot, and I further declare that I intend to support for nomination the candidates named herein.NumberSignaturePrinted nameResidence 1. 2. 3.etc. CIRCULATOR’S
 AFFIDAVITI, ______, solemnly swear (or
 affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]

3.That I secured signatures in the County of ____ to the nomination paper of the group of candidates named in the signer’s statement above as candidates for nomination and
 election by the American Independent Party as delegates to represent the State of California in the party’s next national convention; that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ____, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____, 20_, and ____, 20_, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.
I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct.
 (Signed)Circulator

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 9.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.

Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of the candidate or group of candidates at any time not more than 120 nor less than 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 13.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6592.

An elections official or deputy elections official may not serve as a circulator and circulators may not obtain signatures within 100 feet of any election booth or polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6593.

Each section of a nomination paper, after being verified, shall be returned to the candidate, committee, or duly authorized representatives. All the sections circulated in any county shall be collected by the candidate, committee, or duly authorized representatives, who shall arrange and leave the sections with the elections official for examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.

Prior to filing, the sections of a nomination paper for any candidate or group of candidates shall be numbered in order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6595.

Nomination papers, properly assembled, may be consolidated and fastened together by counties, but nomination papers signed by voters in different counties shall not be fastened together.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6596.

The elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with him or her for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county that does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in the office of the elections official. He or she shall also disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county who has not stated his or her intention to affiliate with the political party named in the nomination papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6597.

Within five days after any nomination papers are left with him or her for examination, the elections official shall:

(a) Examine and affix to them a certificate reciting that he or she has examined them and stating the number of names which have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(b) Transmit the papers with the certificate of examination to the Secretary of State, who shall file the papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6598.

The certificate of the elections official to nomination papers of a candidate or group of candidates shall be in substantially the following form:Certificate of County Elections Official to Nomination 
 Papers of Candidate or Group of CandidatesTo the Secretary of State:
I, County Elections Official of the County of ________,
 hereby certify that I have examined the nomination papers, to which this certificate is attached, of the candidate or group of candidates for election at the ensuing presidential primary, and that the number of names which I have not marked “not sufficient” is __________.
The candidate or group of candidates named in the nomination papers comprise the following (state names of candidates):etc.etc.etc.Dated this ________ day of ________, 20___.________________________(SEAL)County Elections OfficialBy Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 7.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6599.

Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the nomination of a candidate for the presidential preference primary ballot, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate, or his or her duly authorized representative, of that fact.

Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the nomination of a group of candidates for delegates, the Secretary of State shall notify the chairperson of the committee of that fact.

In each case, the Secretary of State shall advise
 the person receiving the notification that no more signatures will be received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. American Independent Presidential Primary Ballot [6620. - 6621.]

6620.

For the presidential primary election, the format of the American Independent Party ballot shall be governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13, with the following exceptions:

(a) In place of the heading “Delegates to National Convention, vote for one group only” shall appear the heading “Presidential Preference, vote for one”.

(b) Selected and unselected presidential candidates shall be listed below the heading
 specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Below the presidential candidates shall appear in the same column, or in the next column if there is not sufficient space in the first column, the heading “Delegates to National Convention, vote for one group.”

(d) The instructions to voters shall be the same as provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13 except that they shall begin with the words, “To express your preference for a candidate for nomination for President, stamp a cross (+) in the square opposite the name of the candidate. Your vote in this portion of the ballot is advisory only. Delegates to the national convention will be elected in the delegate selection portion of the ballot.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6621.

Any person who believes his or her name may be used as a write-in candidate for President of the United States shall, not later than 21 days before the primary election, file his or her endorsement of his or her write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, or no votes shall be counted for him or her.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Postelection Proceedings [6640. - 6647.]

6640.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, compile and file in his or her office a statement of the canvassed returns filed with him or her by the election officials.

The compiled statement shall show for each group the total of the votes received, the votes received in each county, and the names of the candidates comprising that group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6641.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, issue a certificate of election to each person who is a member of the group that received the largest vote cast for any group of that party, the person thereby being elected as delegate to his or her national party convention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6642.

Any person who receives, by write-in vote, a plurality of the votes cast in the delegate selection primary shall, within 37 days after the primary election, file a list of delegates to the national convention with the Secretary of State in the manner prescribed in Sections 6563 and 6564.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6643.

If the candidate fails to file a list of delegates, the state central committee of the party shall, within 10 days of the end of the 37-day period required in Section 6642, file a list of delegates with the Secretary of State. The delegation shall go to the convention unpledged to any candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6644.

If a group of candidates for delegates preferring a particular presidential candidate are elected at the presidential primary, the delegates to the national convention shall, before leaving the state to attend the convention, meet together and select a chairperson of the delegation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6645.

If a group of candidates for delegates expressing no preference for a particular presidential candidate are elected, the chairperson of the group shall serve as chairperson of the delegation. If, for any reason, the chairperson of the group becomes unable to serve as chairperson of the delegation, the delegates shall meet and select a new chairperson as provided in Section 6644.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6646.

If a vacancy exists in the office of the delegate or alternate, the chairperson of the delegation shall designate a person to fill that vacancy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6647.

The alternate of any delegate who is unable to attend the convention shall attend the convention in his or her place and shall otherwise discharge the duties of that delegate. An alternate shall not vote in place of the delegate whom he or she represents when the delegate is occupying his or her seat at the convention.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Peace and Freedom Party Presidential Primary [6700. - 6849.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6700. - 6702.]

6700.

This chapter shall be applicable to the presidential primary ballot of the Peace and Freedom Party only.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

The Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary ballot shall be divided into a presidential preference portion and a national convention delegate selection portion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

No filing fee is required from any person to be voted for at any Peace and Freedom Party presidential primary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Qualification of Candidates for Presidential Preference Portion of Primary Ballot [6720. - 6726.]

6720.

The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the presidential nomination of the Peace and Freedom Party or the national party with which the Peace and Freedom Party is affiliated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6721.

On or before the 120th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall send a letter by first-class mail to the Chairpersons of record of the Peace and Freedom Party State and County Central Committees, informing them that, while a response is not required, any information they wish to submit will be considered by the Secretary of State in the determination of candidates to be placed on the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference primary ballot pursuant to Section 6720.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 14.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6722.

On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement, the Secretary of State may add to the Secretary of State’s selection, but the Secretary of State may not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list. The Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the list and any subsequent additions thereto to the Chairpersons of the Peace and Freedom Party State and County Central Committees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 15.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6723.

When the Secretary of State decides to place the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Sections 6720 and 6722, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate that her or his name will appear on the Peace and Freedom Party presidential preference primary ballot of this state, but that a committee must be formed, delegates certified, and a petition filed pursuant to this chapter in order to have her or his name appear on the delegate selection portion of the presidential primary ballot.

The Secretary of State
 shall also notify the candidate that she or he may withdraw her or his name from the ballot by filing with the Secretary of State an affidavit pursuant to Section 6724, no later than the 68th day before that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6724.

If a selected candidate or an unselected candidate files with the Secretary of State, no later than the 68th day before the presidential primary, an affidavit stating without qualification that she or he is not a candidate for the office of President of the United States at the forthcoming presidential primary election, the name of that candidate shall be omitted from the list of names certified by the Secretary of State to the elections official for the ballot and the name of that candidate shall not appear on the presidential preference portion of the primary
 ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6725.

Any unselected candidate desiring to have her or his name placed on the presidential preference primary ballot without filing a group of candidates for delegates, shall have nomination papers circulated on her or his behalf. In order to qualify the name of that candidate for placement on the presidential preference primary ballot, the nomination papers of the candidate shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the Peace and Freedom Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as members of the Peace and
 Freedom Party as reflected in the report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day preceding the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6726.

Whenever a group of candidates for delegates pledged to a particular presidential candidate qualifies by petition for the national convention delegate selection portion of the presidential primary ballot, the name of the presidential candidate to whom the group is pledged shall automatically be placed on the presidential preference portion of the ballot, without the filing of a separate petition for the presidential preference portion of the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determination of Number to National Convention [6740. - 6745.]

6740.

The Chairperson of the Peace and Freedom Party State Central Committee shall notify the Secretary of State on or before the 120th day preceding the presidential primary as to both of the following:

(a) The name of that national party with which the Peace and Freedom Party has affiliated, by vote of its state central committee, and the address and telephone number of the principal office of that national party.

(b) The number of
 delegates to represent the Peace and Freedom Party of California at the next national convention of that national party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6741.

The notification of national affiliation and number of national convention delegates shall be in substantially the following form: Statement of National Affiliation and Number of 
National Convention Delegates for the Peace and 
Freedom Party of CaliforniaTo the Secretary of State:
Sacramento, CaliforniaYou are hereby notified that the Peace and Freedom Party of California, by vote of its state central committee, has affiliated on the national level with the ______ Party. The address of the ______ Party’s principal office is ______, and its telephone number is _______. 
You are further notified that the number of delegates to represent the Peace and Freedom Party of California in the next national convention of the ______ Party is ______.Dated this ______ day of ______, 19__.Chairperson of the State Central Committee of 
the Peace and Freedom Party of California

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6742.

If the Chairperson of the Peace and Freedom Party State Central Committee fails to file the notice required by Section 6741 by the 120th day preceding the presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall ascertain the national affiliation of the party and the number of delegates from the chairperson or any other officer of record of the party state central committee or from the national party with which the Peace and Freedom Party was affiliated as indicated by the most recent statement of the affiliation on file by the chairperson of the party state central
 committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6743.

On or before the 110th day before the presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall certify all of the following to the elections official of each county:
